Massachusetts, session 194th, H3862.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 of Chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended in line 18, by inserting after the words “carried on” the following:-  
“Dependents of Veterans who meet all eligibility criteria except for the one day residence 
in the commonwealth, shall be eligible for benefits under this chapter provided a dependent 
provides proof of residency in Massachusetts for no less than one year prior to application of 
benefits.